Hawaii statutes.
§183D-39 Report by licensed private and
commercial shooting preserve operator; farmer. The licensee shall make
quarterly reports on the first of July, October, January, and April to the
department on forms to be furnished by the department. The report shall give a
correct statement of:

(1) The total number of game birds owned, killed,
transported, or sold during the period under this chapter;

(2) The names of the persons to whom the same were
transported or sold;

(3) The names of the persons by whom the same were
tagged and sealed;

(4) The increase of all classes of game birds; and

(5) Such other data as the department deems necessary
for the proper protection of the public and observance of the game laws.

Each report shall be verified by the affidavit of
the licensee. [L 1985, c 174, pt of §4]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next